Maryland, session 2025, SB0784.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
4–109.
(a) A license application shall state:
(13) that the applicant or a person on behalf of whom the application is filed
does not have a financial interest in any other place of business in the jurisdiction for which
an alcoholic [beverage] BEVERAGES license has been applied for or issued;
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Incorrect word usage in § 4–109(a)(13) of the Alcoholic Beverages and
Cannabis Article.
Occurred: Ch. 41, § 2, Acts of 2016.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 142
22–1601.
(b) If the number of licenses in a class exceeds the quota specified in subsection
(a) of this section, the Board may not issue a new license of that class unless the number of
licenses of that class [are] IS reduced by revocation or surrender, creating a vacancy under
the particular quota specified.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Grammatical error in § 22–1601(b) of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
Article.
Occurred: Ch. 41, § 2, Acts of 2016.
32–902.
(b) (1) The Board may issue the license for use by:
[(1)] (I) a hotel that has:
[(i)] 1. at least 25 rooms;
[(ii)] 2. a lobby with registration, mail desk, and seating facilities;
and
[(iii)] 3. a dining room that serves full–course meals at least twice
daily; or
[(2) (i)] (II) a restaurant that:
1. has a proper and adequate dining room with facilities for
preparing and serving regular meals;
2. not counting seating at a bar or counter, has table seating
for at least 40 individuals; and
3. has average daily receipts from the sale of food, not
counting foodstuff contained in a mixed drink, that each month exceed the average daily
receipts from the sale of alcoholic beverages.
[(ii)] (2) The seating requirement in [item (i)1 of this item]
PARAGRAPH (1)(II)2 OF THIS SUBSECTION does not apply to a Class B beer, wine, and
liquor license holder who held the license on July 1, 1978.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
– 7 –

Ch. 142 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Error: Tabulation errors and erroneous internal reference in § 32–902(b) of the
Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article.
Occurred: Ch. 41, § 2, Acts of 2016.
33–1504.
(b) The Board may give final approval of the license application for which it had
given tentative approval on completion of the construction or the [remolding]
REMODELING or renovation of the building in accordance with the building plans
submitted by the applicant.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Incorrect word usage in § 33–1504(b) of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
Article.
Occurred: Ch. 41, § 2, Acts of 2016.
Article – Business Occupations and Professions
13–304.
(b) (1) An applicant for a license shall pay to the Secretary an application fee
of:
(i) 1. $200, if the applicant is an individual; or
[(ii)] 2. $375, if the applicant is a firm; and
[(iii)] (II) the fees authorized under subsection (c)(2) of this section.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Tabulation error in § 13–304(b)(1) of the Business Occupations and
Professions Article.
Occurred: Ch. 418, § 3, Acts of 2002.
19–304.
(b) (1) An applicant for a license shall pay to the Secretary an application fee
of:
(i) 1. $200, if the applicant is an individual; or
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 142
[(ii)] 2. $375, if the applicant is a firm; and
[(iii)] (II) the fees authorized under subsection (c) of this section.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Tabulation error in § 19–304(b)(1) of the Business Occupations and
Professions Article.
Occurred: Ch. 418, § 3, Acts of 2002.
Article – Business Regulation
Subtitle 2. Electronic [Nicotine Delivery Systems] SMOKING DEVICES Licenses.
16.7–201.
(a) A person must hold an appropriate license before the person may act as:
(1) an electronic smoking devices manufacturer;
(2) an electronic smoking devices retailer;
(3) an electronic smoking devices wholesaler distributor;
(4) an electronic smoking devices wholesaler importer; or
(5) a vape shop vendor.
(b) A place of business in which a person acts as an electronic smoking devices
retailer or a vape shop vendor must hold an appropriate license.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Obsolete terminology in the subtitle designation immediately preceding §
16.7–201 of the Business Regulation Article.
Occurred: As a result of Ch. 396, Acts of 2019, which redesignated Title 16.7 of the
Business Regulation Article as “Electronic Smoking Devices Licenses”.
Article – Commercial Law
11–501.
(m) (1) “Wholesale sale of cigarettes” includes any sale whereby cigarettes are
sold for a valuable consideration, made in the ordinary course of trade or in the usual
– 9 –

Ch. 142 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
conduct of the seller’s business to a retailer, other than to a vending machine operator or
to a sub–wholesaler described in subsection [(m)(2)] (N)(2) of this section, for the bona fide
purpose of resale.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Erroneous internal reference in § 11–501(m)(1) of the Commercial Law
Article.
Occurred: As a result of Ch. 450, Acts of 2023, which renumbered § 11–501(g)
through (m) of the Commercial Law Article to be § 11–501(h) through (n), respectively.
16A–101.
(d) (2) If there is a genuine dispute as to the reasonableness or amount of the
fees assessed by an authorized tow company the authorized tow company shall release the
cargo immediately to the owner or the owner’s authorized agent in accordance with this
subsection on submission of:
(ii) If the cargo belongs to the transportation company:
1. A letter from the insurance company stating there is
coverage for the relevant claim or accident and including, at minimum, a claim number,
policy number, and policy limit; or
2. If an insurance policy required under item [2] 1 of this
item is not high enough to cover the cost of the cargo clean–up, a signed letter of guarantee
from the transportation company.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Erroneous internal reference in § 16A–101(d)(2)(ii)2 of the Commercial Law
Article.
Occurred: Ch. 575, Acts of 2022; and as a result of Ch. 669, § 3, Acts of 2023, which
repealed § 16A–101(d)(2)(ii) of the Commercial Law Article and renumbered items (i)1 and
2 to be items (i) and (ii), respectively.
Article – Corporations and Associations
5–6B–30.
(a) The dispute settlement mechanism provided by this section applies to any
complaint or demand formally arising on or after October 1, [2023] 2024, unless the bylaws
of the cooperative housing corporation or the proprietary lease of the member who is a party
to the dispute state otherwise.
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 142
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Incorrect date in § 5–6B–30(a) of the Corporations and Associations Article.
Occurred: Chs. 255 and 256, Acts of 2024. Correction suggested by the Attorney
General in the Bill Review Letter for S.B. 15 (Ch. 255)/H.B. 309 (Ch. 256) of 2024 (footnote
1), dated April 16, 2024.
Article – Correctional Services
5–201.
(b) The Division consists of:
(3) the [Maryland] METROPOLITAN Transition Center;
(4) the Chesapeake Detention [Center] FACILITY; and
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Misnomers in § 5–201(b)(3) and (4) of the Correctional Services Article.
Occurred: Chs. 99 and 100, Acts of 2024.
7–309.
(d) Following review of the request, the Commission may:
(2) request that [department] DEPARTMENT or local correctional facility
personnel provide information for formal consideration of parole release.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Capitalization error in § 7–309(d)(2) of the Correctional Services Article.
Occurred: Ch. 299, Acts of 2008.
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
3–1505.
(c) (1) If the respondent appears for the final peace order hearing, has been
served with an interim peace order or a temporary peace order, or the court otherwise has
personal jurisdiction over the respondent, the judge:
– 11 –

Ch. 142 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) May proceed with the final peace order hearing; and
(ii) If the judge finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the
respondent has committed, and is likely to commit in the future, an act specified in §
3–1503(a) of this subtitle against the petitioner or the petitioner’s employee, or if the
respondent consents to the entry of a peace order, [the court] may issue a final peace order
to protect the petitioner or the petitioner’s employee.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Extraneous language in § 3–1505(c)(1) of the Courts Article.
Occurred: Ch. 235, Acts of 2002.
Article – Criminal Law
4–111.
(a) (5) “Law enforcement official” has the meaning stated in § 4–201 of this
[article] TITLE.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Stylistic error in § 4–111(a)(5) of the Criminal Law Article.
Occurred: Ch. 680, Acts of 2023.
9–804.
(g) (2) Assets divested under this section and derived from the commission of,
attempted commission of, conspiracy to commit, or solicitation of a crime described in
paragraph (1) of this subsection, either in whole or in part:
(i) if the State investigated and prosecuted a violation described in
paragraph (1) of this subsection, shall be deposited in the Addiction Treatment Divestiture
Fund established under § 8–6D–01 of the Health – General Article; [or]
(ii) if a local jurisdiction investigated and prosecuted a violation
described in paragraph (1) of this subsection, shall be used by the local jurisdiction:
1. to support alternatives to incarceration, reentry programs,
and addiction treatment services for persons with substance–related disorders;
2. to combat criminal organizations through education,
training, and resources; or
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 142
3. to provide assistance to victims of criminal
organization–related crimes; [and] OR
(iii) if more than one jurisdiction participated in an investigation or
a prosecution of a violation described in paragraph (1) of this subsection, shall be divided
in the manner agreed on by the jurisdictions and used as provided in item (i) or (ii) of this
paragraph.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Extraneous and incorrect conjunctions in § 9–804(g)(2) of the Criminal Law
Article.
Occurred: Ch. 422, Acts of 2020.
Article – Economic Development
5–704.
(a) (1) The Secretary may [only] designate an area as an enterprise zone
ONLY if the area:
(i) is in a priority funding area or in a qualified opportunity zone
under § 1400Z–1 of the Internal Revenue Code in Allegany County, Garrett County,
Somerset County, or Wicomico County or meets an exception under Title 5, Subtitle 7B of
the State Finance and Procurement Article; and
(ii) satisfies at least one of the requirements specified in paragraph
(2) of this subsection.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Grammatical error in § 5–704(a)(1) of the Economic Development Article.
Occurred: Ch. 306, § 2, Acts of 2008.
5–1303.
(b) An area shall receive priority consideration for designation as a BRAC
Revitalization and Incentive Zone under this section if the area is within one–half mile of
a present or planned:
(2) Baltimore Metro [Subway] SUBWAYLINK station;
(3) Baltimore [MTA] Light [Rail] RAILLINK station; or
– 13 –

Ch. 142 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Misnomers in § 5–1303(b)(2) and (3) of the Economic Development Article.
Occurred: As a result of the renaming of the Baltimore Metro Subway and Baltimore
MTA Light Rail to be the Baltimore Metro SubwayLink and Baltimore Light RailLink,
respectively, following the enactment of Ch. 338, Acts of 2008.
5–1501.
(a) IN THIS SECTION, “ELIGIBLE FUND MANAGER” MEANS:
(1) AN ENTITY THAT HAS SIGNIFICANT FINANCIAL OR INVESTMENT
EXPERIENCE, UNDER CRITERIA DEVELOPED BY THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(2) INCLUDES AN ENTITY THAT THE DEPARTMENT DESIGNATES TO
MANAGE FUNDS RECEIVED UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(1) OF THIS SECTION.
(B) There is a Small, Minority, and Women–Owned Businesses Account under the
authority of the Department.
[(b)] (C) (1) The Account shall receive money as required under § 9–1A–27 of
the State Government Article.
(2) Money in the Account shall be invested and reinvested by the Treasurer
and interest and earnings shall accrue to the Account.
(3) The Comptroller shall:
(i) account for the Account; and
(ii) on a properly approved transmittal prepared by the Department,
issue a warrant to pay out money from the Account in the manner provided under this
section.
(4) The Account is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302
of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(5) Expenditures from the Account shall only be made on a properly
approved transmittal prepared by the Department as provided under subsection [(c)] (D)
of this section.
[(c)] (D) (1) [In this subsection, “eligible fund manager”:
(i) means an entity that has significant financial or investment
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 142
experience, under criteria developed by the Department; and
(ii) includes an entity that the Department designates to manage
funds received under subsection (b)(1)(i) of this section.
(2)] (i) Subject to the provisions of paragraph [(3)] (2) of this subsection,
the Department shall make grants to eligible fund managers to provide investment capital
and financial assistance to small, minority, and women–owned businesses in the State.
(ii) 1. Financial assistance provided by eligible fund managers
shall be in the form of:
A. a loan; or
B. subject to subsubparagraph 2 of this subparagraph, a
grant.
2. Financial assistance in the form of a grant:
A. may not exceed $10,000 and shall be issued in conjunction
with a loan of any amount; or
B. shall be made pursuant to subsection [(h)] (I) of this
section.
[(3)] (2) Except for money received from the Strategic Energy Investment
Fund, the Department shall ensure that eligible fund managers allocate at least 50% of the
funds from this Account to small, minority, and women–owned businesses in the
jurisdictions and communities surrounding a video lottery facility.
[(d)] (E) (1) Any money received from the Strategic Energy Investment Fund
shall be used to benefit small, minority, women–owned, and veteran–owned businesses in
the clean energy industry in the State.
(2) The Department shall make grants to eligible fund managers to provide
investment capital, including direct equity investments and similar investments and
financial assistance to small, minority, women–owned, and veteran–owned businesses in
the clean energy industry in the State.
[(e)] (F) Fund managers receiving grants under this section shall:
(1) keep proper records of funds and accounts;
(2) provide an annual report to the Department on investment capital and
financial assistance made pursuant to subsection [(c)] (D) of this section; and
– 15 –

Ch. 142 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) be subject to audit by the Office of Legislative Audits of the Department
of Legislative Services.
[(f)] (G) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, an eligible fund
manager may use money from grants received under this section to pay expenses for
administrative, actuarial, legal, and technical services.
(2) The Department shall set the maximum amount of grant money that
each eligible fund manager may use under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
[(g)] (H) (1) Subject to paragraphs (2) through (4) of this subsection, an
eligible fund manager may use money from a grant received under subsection [(d)(1)]
(E)(1) of this section to pay ordinary and reasonable expenses for administrative, actuarial,
legal, marketing, and technical services and management fees.
(2) The Department shall:
(i) maintain all money received from the Strategic Energy
Investment Fund in a single account; and
(ii) make grant allocations to an eligible fund manager as the
manager advises the Department that the manager has approved and prepared to fund an
investment or provide financial assistance.
(3) Any allocation that the Department makes to an eligible fund manager
from the Strategic Energy Investment Fund shall include:
(i) the amount of the investment or financial assistance; and
(ii) up to an additional 3% of the total investment or financial
assistance commitment amount as a management fee for the benefit and compensation of
the eligible fund manager.
(4) An eligible fund manager that receives an allocation from the Strategic
Energy Investment Fund shall retain for the manager’s benefit:
(i) all management fees paid by the Department; and
(ii) all interest earned from a loan made by the eligible fund manager
under this subsection.
[(h)] (I) (1) Notwithstanding any provisions in this section to the contrary,
this subsection applies to businesses in areas of the State that are:
(i) declared to be federal disaster areas;
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 142
(ii) subject to a federal declaration of emergency; or
(iii) subject to an official declaration of emergency by the Governor.
(2) In an area of the State described in paragraph (1) of this subsection, an
eligible fund manager may:
(i) provide financial assistance under this section to a small,
minority, or women–owned business in the form of a grant; or
(ii) convert to a grant part or all of a loan that was provided to a
small, minority, or women–owned business before the area was declared a federal disaster
area or became subject to a declaration of emergency.
(3) (i) The amount of any grant or loan converted to a grant under this
subsection may not exceed $50,000 for a single business.
(ii) The aggregate total of financial assistance provided in the form
of grants and loans converted to grants under this subsection may not exceed $10,000,000
in a fiscal year.
[(i)] (J) The Legislative Auditor shall audit the utilization of the funds that are
allocated to small, minority, and women–owned businesses by eligible fund managers
under subsection [(c)(3)] (D)(2) of this section during an audit of the applicable State unit
as provided in § 2–1220 of the State Government Article.
[(j)] (K) In accordance with § 2.5–109 of this article, the Department shall
submit a report on amounts received by and expended by the Strategic Energy Investment
Fund.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Stylistic error in § 5–1501 of the Economic Development Article. Obsolete
cross–reference in § 5–1501(c)(1)(ii) of the Economic Development Article.
Occurred: Ch. 4, Acts of the Special Session of 2007, which defined the term “eligible
fund manager” only with respect to § 5–1501(c) of the Economic Development Article while
that term is utilized in other subsections of that section. Obsolete cross–reference in §
5–1501(c)(1)(ii) occurred as a result of Ch. 474, § 2, Acts of 2024, which repealed
subparagraph (ii) of § 5–1501(b)(1).
5–2503.
(c) A member of the [Board] COMMISSION:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the [Board]
– 17 –

Ch. 142 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
COMMISSION; but
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Misnomer in § 5–2503(c) of the Economic Development Article.
Occurred: Ch. 409, Acts of 2024.
6–301.
(d) (1) “Qualified position” means:
(i) if the position [if] IS filled before October 1, 2021, a position that:
1. is full–time and of indefinite duration;
2. pays at least 120% of the State minimum wage;
3. is located in the State;
4. is newly created as a result of the establishment or
expansion of a business facility in a single location in the State; and
5. is filled; and
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Incorrect word usage in § 6–301(d)(1)(i) of the Economic Development Article.
Occurred: Ch. 22, Acts of the Special Session of 2021.
10–1117.
The Board shall:
(7) conduct an annual performance review of the Chief [Operating]
EXECUTIVE Officer.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Misnomer in § 10–1117(7) of the Economic Development Article.
Occurred: Ch. 123, Acts of 2024.
12–609.
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 142
(b) The owners of nonexempt property who seek to establish a district shall send
notice of the public hearing and a summary of the application to each owner [and] AND, to
the extent reasonably ascertainable, each commercial tenant of nonexempt property within
the proposed district at least 90 days before the public hearing or when owners of at least
20% of the total number of parcels of nonexempt property express the intent to establish a
district, whichever is earlier.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Omitted comma in § 12–609(b) of the Economic Development Article.
Occurred: Ch. 283, Acts of 2022.
13–620.
The plan shall include:
(6) recommendations for meeting THE housing needs of existing and
prospective immigrant [population] POPULATIONS of the region;
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Grammatical errors in § 13–620(6) of the Economic Development Article.
Occurred: Ch. 306, § 2, Acts of 2008.
Subtitle 12. Regional [Additive] ADVANCED Manufacturing Partnership of Maryland.
13–1201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the Executive Board of the Partnership.
(c) “Executive Director” means the Executive Director of the Partnership.
(d) “Fund” means the Regional Advanced Manufacturing Partnership of
Maryland Fund, also known as the RAMP MD Fund.
(e) “Partnership” means the Regional Advanced Manufacturing Partnership of
Maryland, also known as RAMP MD.
(f) “Region” means Cecil and Harford counties.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
– 19 –

Ch. 142 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Error: Obsolete terminology in the subtitle designation immediately preceding §
13–1201 of the Economic Development Article.
Occurred: As a result of Ch. 470, Acts of 2024, which renamed the Regional Additive
Manufacturing Partnership of Maryland to be the Regional Advanced Manufacturing
Partnership of Maryland, but failed to amend the subtitle designation to reflect the
renaming.
Article – Education
3–1301.
(f) (1) In this [section] SUBSECTION, “Washington County Delegation”
means the Senators and Delegates in the General Assembly of Maryland who are elected
to represent Washington County or any portion of Washington County.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Stylistic error in § 3–1301(f)(1) of the Education Article.
Occurred: Ch. 512, Acts of 2008.
5–239.
(c) (2) For Baltimore City, the local share of major education aid may be
reduced only by the amount by which the State funds provided under § 5–214 of this subtitle
[exceed] EXCEEDS $10,000,000.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Grammatical error in § 5–239(c)(2) of the Education Article.
Occurred: Ch. 36, Acts of 2021.
6–121.
(a) A teacher preparation program shall:
(2) Require program participants to demonstrate competency in each of the
components required under [paragraph] ITEM (1) of this subsection; and
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Incorrect word usage in § 6–121(a)(2) of the Education Article.
Occurred: Ch. 36, Acts of 2021.
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 142
7–101.2.
(f) The Department shall:
(1) Leverage Child Care [Subsidy] SCHOLARSHIP Program funds when
making grant awards to private providers that participate in the Child Care [Subsidy]
SCHOLARSHIP Program;
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Misnomer in § 7–101.2(f)(1) of the Education Article.
Occurred: Ch. 2, Acts of 2014.
7–205.1.
(e) (3) (i) The implementation of the courses required under this
subsection:
1. Shall include an assessment or reassessment of the
student after completion of the course;
2. May not preclude or replace enrollment in a course
otherwise required for graduation from high school; and
3. Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, beginning
with the 2022–2023 school year, may not preclude enrollment in the initial stages of one or
more post–CCR pathways established under subsection [(i)] (G) of this section, including
the opportunity to make progress towards a CTE credential.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Erroneous cross–reference in § 7–205.1(e)(3)(i) of the Education Article.
Occurred: Ch. 36, Acts of 2021.
7–303.
(a) (6) “Reportable offense” means an offense that:
(i) Occurred off school premises;
(ii) Did not occur at an event sponsored by the school; and
(iii) Involved any of the following:
– 21 –

Ch. 142 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. Any of the offenses enumerated in [§ 3–8A–03(e)(4)] §
3–8A–03(D)(4) of the Courts Article;
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Erroneous cross–reference in § 7–303(a)(6)(iii)2 of the Education Article.
Occurred: Ch. 41, Acts of 2022.
7–1501.
(j) “School resource officer” means:
(1) A law enforcement officer as defined under [§ 3–101(e)] § 1–101(C) of
the Public Safety Article who has been assigned to a school in accordance with a
memorandum of understanding between the chief of a law enforcement agency as defined
under [§ 3–101(b)] § 3–201(D) of the Public Safety Article and the local education agency;
or
(2) A Baltimore City school police officer, as defined in § 4–318 of this
article.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Erroneous cross–references in § 7–1501(j) of the Education Article.
Occurred: Ch. 30, Acts of 2018 and as a result of Ch. 5, Acts of 2003, which defined
“law enforcement agency” in § 3–201(d) as part of the newly established Public Safety
Article, and Ch. 59, Acts of 2021, which instructed the publishers of the Annotated Code of
Maryland that cross–references to the term “law enforcement officer” shall be redesignated
as stated under § 1–101(c) of the Public Safety Article.
9.9–104.
(b) (1) A community school coordinator shall be responsible for:
(iv) Coordinating support programs that address out–of–school
learning barriers for students and families, including:
1. Wraparound services; and
2. As appropriate:
A. Tutoring;
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 142
B. English language learner courses;
C. Early childhood development and parenting classes;
D. College and career advising;
E. Employment opportunities;
F. Citizenship education;
G. Food pantries;
H. Rental assistance, in accordance with § 9.9–104.1 of this
[subtitle] TITLE; and
I. School–based behavioral and physical health services.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Stylistic error in § 9.9–104(b)(1)(iv) of the Education Article.
Occurred: Ch. 210, Acts of 2024.
10–203.
(c) Funding proposals for public senior higher education institutions shall
include:
(2) Special initiative funding:
(i) For academic programs at historically [African American]
BLACK colleges and universities; and
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Misnomer in § 10–203(c)(2)(i) of the Education Article.
Occurred: Ch. 290, Acts of 1992.
12–304.
(d) (2) The Governor shall include in the annual State budget for the
University of Maryland Baltimore County, to further its mission as a research university
and to complement the economic development and research activities of the MPowering
Joint Steering Council, a General Fund appropriation in the following amounts:
– 23 –

Ch. 142 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(v) $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2025 and each FISCAL year thereafter.
(3) The Governor shall include in the annual State budget for the Council
to use exclusively on the University of Maryland Institute for Health Computing a General
Fund appropriation in the following amounts:
(iv) $6,000,000 in fiscal year 2029 and each FISCAL year thereafter.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Omitted word in § 12–304(d)(2)(v) and (3)(iv) of the Education Article.
Occurred: Ch. 765, Acts of 2019 and Ch. 181, Acts of 2024.
13–703.
(a) (1) In this [section:
(1) “Recyclable] SECTION, “RECYCLABLE materials” means materials
that:
(i) If not recycled, would become solid waste for disposal in a refuse
disposal system; and
(ii) May be collected, separated, or processed and returned to the
marketplace in the form of raw materials or products[; and].
(2) “Recyclable materials” includes paper, glass, metals, plastics, and
cardboard.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Stylistic error in § 13–703(a) of the Education Article.
Occurred: Ch. 49, Acts of 2023.
18–601.
(f) (1) Each postsecondary institution shall determine the eligibility of
persons who apply to the institution for the Edward T. AND MARY A. Conroy Memorial
Scholarship Program and the Jean B. Cryor Memorial Scholarship Program.
(2) Funds for the Edward T. AND MARY A. Conroy Memorial Scholarship
Program and the Jean B. Cryor Memorial Scholarship Program shall be allocated by the
Commission to each postsecondary institution based on the number of eligible recipients
– 24 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 142
attending each institution.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Omitted word in § 18–601(f)(1) and (2) of the Education Article.
Occurred: As a result of Ch. 215, Acts of 2015, which changed the name of the Edward
T. Conroy Memorial Scholarship Program to be the Edward T. and Mary A. Conroy
Memorial Scholarship Program.
18–3903.
(f) (2) The amount of the Scholarship shall be reduced if the total amount of
scholarship funds and additional resources [exceed] EXCEEDS tuition and mandatory fees.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Grammatical error in § 18–3903(f)(2) of the Education Article.
Occurred: Ch. 426, Acts of 2024.
18–4102.
(a) In Anne Arundel County, the governing [board] BODY of the county may
establish a student loan assistance repayment program for educators employed by the Anne
Arundel County Public School System.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Incorrect word usage in § 18–4102(a) of the Education Article.
Occurred: Chs. 364 and 365, Acts of 2024. Correction suggested by the Attorney
General in the Bill Review Letter for H.B. 541 (Ch. 364)/S.B. 657 (Ch. 365) of 2024 (footnote
3), dated April 23, 2024.
Article – Election Law
3–203.
(j) (1) Each automatic voter registration agency shall:
(i) on or before July 1, 2019, submit a report, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the Senate [Education, Health, and
Environmental Affairs] Committee ON EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT
and the House Committee on Ways and Means that describes:
– 25 –

Ch. 142 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. the efforts of the automatic voter registration agency to
register voters in the preceding calendar year; and
2. the implementation of an automatic voter registration
system; and
(ii) on or before January 1, 2020, and January 1 each subsequent
year, submit a report, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the
Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs] Committee ON EDUCATION,
ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT and the House Committee on Ways and Means that
describes:
1. the number of individuals who completed an applicable
transaction in the preceding calendar year at the automatic voter registration agency and
the number of those individuals who registered to vote or updated a voter registration
record; and
2. any efforts the automatic voter registration agency plans
to make to improve the efficiency and effectiveness of the voter registration process at the
agency.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Obsolete terminology in § 3–203(j)(1) of the Election Law Article.
Occurred: As a result of the renaming of the Senate Education, Health, and
Environmental Affairs Committee to be the Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and
the Environment in December 2022.
16–1002.
A person who violates [§ 16–201(a)(6) or (7)] § 16–201(B)(6) OR (7) or § 16–903 of
this title without knowing that the act is illegal shall pay a civil penalty and have the
matter adjudicated in accordance with § 13–604 of this article.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Obsolete cross–reference in § 16–1002 of the Election Law Article.
Occurred: As a result of Ch. 126, Acts of 2024, which redesignated § 16–201(a) of the
Election Law Article as § 16–201(b) of the Election Law Article.
Article – Environment
5–1104.
– 26 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 142
(b) The Oversight Committee shall be composed of the following members:
(5) 1 individual from the Baltimore County [Waterman’s] WATERMEN’S
Association;
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Misspelling in § 5–1104(b)(5) of the Environment Article.
Occurred: Ch. 587, Acts of 1981.
9–353.
(f) “Waters of the State” [include] INCLUDES:
(1) Both surface and underground waters within the boundaries of the
State subject to its jurisdiction;
(2) That portion of the Atlantic Ocean within the boundaries of the State;
(3) The Chesapeake Bay and its tributaries;
(4) All ponds, lakes, rivers, streams, public ditches, tax ditches, and public
drainage systems within the State, other than those designed and used to collect, convey,
or dispose of sanitary sewage; and
(5) The floodplain of free–flowing waters determined by the Department on
the basis of the 100–year flood frequency.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Grammatical error in § 9–353(f) of the Environment Article.
Occurred: Chs. 556 and 557, Acts of 2024.
9–1605.
(d) Amounts in the Water Quality Fund may be used only:
(16) To serve as guarantee for long–term [Pay for Success]
PAY–FOR–SUCCESS contracts, green bonds, or environmental impact bonds by any public,
private, or nonprofit entity for the purchase of outcomes that provide a water quality
benefit.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
– 27 –

Ch. 142 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Error: Obsolete terminology in § 9–1605(d)(16) of the Environment Article.
Occurred: As a result of Chs. 237 and 238, Acts of 2022, which established a
framework for pay–for–success contracting in the State.
9–2501.
(f) (2) “Producer” does not include:
(vii) An entity that owns or operates a single retail sales
establishment that:
1. Has no online sales; and
2. Is not supplied or operated as part of a franchise or a
chain; [or]
(viii) [1.] An entity that [is]:
1. IS licensed under Title 2 of the Alcoholic Beverages and
Cannabis Article; and
2. Generated less than $10,000,000 in gross revenue during
the immediately preceding calendar year; or
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Extraneous conjunction in § 9–2501(f)(2)(vii) of the Environment Article and
tabulation error in § 9–2501(f)(2)(viii) of the Environment Article.
Occurred: Ch. 465, Acts of 2023.
Article – Family Law
4–516.
(b) (4) The Governor’s Office of Crime Prevention[, Youth, and Victim
Services] AND POLICY shall:
(i) administer the Fund; and
(ii) establish procedures to award grants from the Fund.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Misnomer in § 4–516(b)(4) of the Family Law Article.
– 28 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 142
Occurred: As a result of Ch. 1, Acts of 2024, which renamed the Governor’s Office of
Crime Prevention, Youth, and Victim Services to be the Governor’s Office of Crime
Prevention and Policy.
Article – Health – General
4–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
[(o) “Mother” has the meaning stated in § 5–1001 of the Family Law Article.]
[(p)] (O) “Mortician” means a funeral director, mortician, or other person who is
authorized to make final disposition of a body.
(P) “MOTHER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 5–1001 OF THE FAMILY LAW
ARTICLE.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Stylistic error (failure to codify definitions in alphabetical order) in § 4–201(o)
and (p) of the Health – General Article.
Occurred: Chs. 437 and 438, Acts of 2019.
7.5–903.
(a) The Council consists of the following members:
(7) Three individuals appointed by the Governor:
(ii) One of whom represents a community–based substance use
disorder and mental health treatment [programs] PROGRAM; and
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Grammatical error in § 7.5–903(a)(7)(ii) of the Health – General Article.
Occurred: Ch. 270, Acts of 2022.
Subtitle 2. [Mental Hygiene Administration] MENTAL HEALTH PLANS AND SERVICES.
10–205.
(a) The Administration may administer a program of nonresidential services for
– 29 –

Ch. 142 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
individuals who have mental disorders or have conditions that may lead to mental
disorders:
(1) To develop, extend, and improve services for finding these individuals;
and
(2) To provide facilities for diagnosis and treatment of nonresidential cases.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Erroneous subtitle designation immediately preceding § 10–205 of the Health
– General Article.
Occurred: As a result of Ch. 460, Acts of 2014, which repealed the laws establishing
and governing the Mental Hygiene Administration due to the establishment of the
Behavioral Health Administration.
13–5004.
(b) The report required under subsection (a) of this section shall:
(1) Describe the activities of the Council under [§ 13–4803(a)] §
13–5003(A) of this subtitle;
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Erroneous cross–reference in § 13–5004(b)(1) of the Health – General Article.
Occurred: As a result of Chs. 360 and 361, Acts of 2023, Ch. 369, Acts of 2023, and
Ch. 385, Acts of 2023, all of which added Title 13, Subtitle 48 of the Health – General
Article, and Chs. 290 and 291, Acts of 2023, which added Title 13, Subtitles 48 and 49 of
the Health – General Article.
18–108.
(b) (3) (I) [Upon] ON presentation by the participant of a written request,
including justification, a local agency may mail or otherwise deliver food instruments to an
individual on the basis of the difficulty of the participant and the participant’s proxies in
obtaining the food instruments.
(II) The justification may include:
[(i)] 1. Illness;
[(ii)] 2. Imminent childbirth;
– 30 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 142
[(iii)] 3. Difficulty of access to the local agency; or
[(iv)] 4. Handicapping condition.
(4) (I) The Secretary shall institute at least one pilot program in a local
subdivision or part of a subdivision utilizing a credit card system along with or in place of
a food instrument system.
(II) Implementation must take place within a reasonable period of
time from the date of enactment of this section, unless such a pilot program is found to be
inconsistent with subsection (d) of this section and a waiver is not granted.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Tabulation and stylistic errors in § 18–108(b)(3) and (4) of the Health –
General Article.
Occurred: Ch. 784, Acts of 1986.
18–214.
(m) On or before December 15 of each year, the Commission shall submit a report
on its findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of
the State Government Article, to the Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental
Affairs] FINANCE Committee and the House Health and Government Operations
Committee.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Erroneous committee reference in § 18–214(m) of the Health – General
Article.
Occurred: As a result of a change in jurisdiction of the Senate Committee on
Education, Energy, and the Environment (formerly the Senate Education, Health, and
Environmental Affairs Committee) and the Senate Finance Committee in 2023, which
resulted in all health matters being handled by the Senate Finance Committee.
19–108.4.
(c) (2) The workgroup required under this subsection shall include
representatives of:
(ii) The Health Services COST Review Commission;
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
– 31 –

Ch. 142 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Error: Omitted word in § 19–108.4(c)(2)(ii) of the Health – General Article.
Occurred: Ch. 667, Acts of 2022.
19–213.
(a) [(1)] In this section [the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Facilities”], “FACILITIES” means hospitals and related institutions
whose rates have been approved by the Commission.
(d) (8) (I) The Fund shall be used only to provide funding for the
Commission and for the purposes authorized under this subtitle.
(II) The costs of the Commission include the administrative costs
incurred by the Department on behalf of the Commission.
(f) (I) On or before September 1 of each year, each facility assessed under this
section shall make payment to the Commission.
(II) The Commission shall make provision for partial payments.
(h) (2) (I) If notice of intent to terminate is made by the federal government
to this State [prior to] BEFORE the first day of an intervening session of the Maryland
General Assembly, this section shall expire June 30 of the following calendar year.
[However, under]
(II) UNDER no circumstances shall less than [seven] 7 calendar
months occur between notice of termination and expiration of this section.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Tabulation and stylistic errors in § 19–213(a), (d)(8), (f), and (h)(2) of the
Health – General Article.
Occurred: Ch. 132, Acts of 1983, Ch. 136, Acts of 1993, and Ch. 430, Acts of 2004.
Article – Health Occupations
6–202.
(b) (2) (ii) In addition to the requirements of paragraph (1) of this
subsection, each licensed massage [therapy] THERAPIST member of the Board shall be in
good standing with the Board.
– 32 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 142
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Incorrect terminology in § 6–202(b)(2)(ii) of the Health Occupations Article.
Occurred: Ch. 739, Acts of 2016.
8–301.
(d) Subsections (a), (b), and (c) of this section do not apply to:
(4) An individual permitted to practice registered nursing or licensed
practical nursing under rules and regulations adopted by the Board, if the individual:
(ii) 1. Has an application for a license pending before the
Board[:]; AND
[1.] 2. A. [But has] HAS not taken the examination required
under this title;
[2.] B. Has taken an examination under this title, but the
results of the examination are not yet known;
[3.] C. Has taken and passed an examination under this
title, but is waiting for the completion of the criminal history records check; or
[4.] D. Has taken and failed an examination required
under this title but has not failed the examination more than one time within the 120–day
period immediately following the submission of the application to the Board;
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Tabulation error in § 8–301(d)(4)(ii) of the Health Occupations Article.
Occurred: Ch. 8, Acts of 1981.
8–6A–07.
(a) Subject to subsection [(f)] (G) of this section, the Board shall certify any
applicant who meets the requirements of this subtitle.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Erroneous internal reference in § 8–6A–07(a) of the Health Occupations
Article.
Occurred: As a result of Ch. 681, Acts of 2022, which renumbered § 8–6A–07(f) of the
– 33 –

Ch. 142 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Health Occupations Article to be § 8–6A–07(g).
Article – Housing and Community Development
12–104.
(c) (2) Property is used for essential public and governmental purposes and is
exempt from all taxes and special assessments of the State or a political subdivision if the
property:
(i) belongs to an authority or a nonprofit housing corporation; [or]
(ii) is used as housing for persons of eligible income and is owned in
whole or in part, directly or indirectly, through one or more wholly or partially owned
subsidiary entities of a Baltimore Housing Authority entity; [or]
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Extraneous conjunctions in § 12–104(c)(2)(i) and (ii) of the Housing and
Community Development Article.
Occurred: Ch. 126, Acts of 2018 and Ch. 151, Acts of 2019.
Article – Insurance
15–854.
(a) (2) An insurer, a nonprofit health service plan, or a health maintenance
organization that provides coverage for prescription drugs through a pharmacy benefits
manager or that contracts with a private review agent under Subtitle 10B of this [article]
TITLE is subject to the requirements of this section.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Stylistic error in § 15–854(a)(2) of the Insurance Article.
Occurred: Ch. 549, Acts of 2019.
Article – Labor and Employment
8.3–101.
(i) “Family member” means:
(9) a biological grandparent, an [adopted] ADOPTIVE grandparent, a
foster grandparent, or a stepgrandparent of the covered individual;
– 34 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 142
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Incorrect word usage in § 8.3–101(i)(9) of the Labor and Employment Article.
Occurred: Ch. 48, Acts of 2022.
Article – Land Use
10–103.
(b) The following provisions of this division apply to Baltimore City:
(13) [§ 4–207] § 4–208 (Exceptions – Maryland Accessibility Code);
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Erroneous cross–reference in § 10–103(b)(13) of the Land Use Article.
Occurred: As a result of Ch. 426, Acts of 2012, which transferred and revised Article
66B to be Division I of the Land Use Article.
Article – Local Government
1–1320.
(c) Subject to subsection (d) of this section and except as provided in subsection
(e) of this section, on or before August 1, 2025, each county and municipality shall
implement solar permitting software for features supporting the tracking and approval of
residential building permits for:
(3) main [electric] ELECTRICAL panel upgrades; and
(4) main [electric] ELECTRICAL panel derates.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Incorrect word usage in § 1–1320 of the Local Government Article.
Occurred: Ch. 595, Acts of 2024.
Article – Natural Resources
8–2A–02.
(f) (3) (i) In each fiscal year from 2023 through 2031, inclusive, $1,250,000
– 35 –

Ch. 142 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
from the Trust Fund shall be used to fund:
2. Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, 13
contractor positions in the Forest Service of the Department to provide technical assistance,
planning, and coordination related to tree plantings, tree buffer management, and forest
management, including invasive vine removal, on public, private, and agricultural lands
and in “underserved areas” as defined in § 8–1911 of this [article] TITLE.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Stylistic error in § 8–2A–02(f)(3)(i)2 of the Natural Resources Article.
Occurred: Ch. 645, § 3, Acts of 2021.
8–1805.
(a) (1) The Commission shall have the staff provided for in the State budget.
[(1)] (2) The staff assigned to the Coastal Zone Management Program in
the Department shall assist the Commission in the development of regulations and the
review of programs.
[(2)] (3) The State departments represented on the Commission may lend
staff or other assistance to the Commission.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Tabulation error in § 8–1805(a) of the Natural Resources Article.
Occurred: Ch. 794, Acts of 1984.
8–1809.
(q) (4) If the Commission approves a proposed program amendment subject to
one or more conditions under [item] PARAGRAPH (3)(iii) of this subsection, the local
jurisdiction shall notify the Commission within 60 days of its intent to adopt the conditions.
(r) (3) (iii) If the chair’s determination is not overridden, within 10 working
days after the opportunity to override the chair’s decision under [item] SUBPARAGRAPH
(i) of this paragraph, the chair shall:
1. Determine if the program refinement is consistent with
the purposes, policies, goals, and provisions of this subtitle, and all criteria of the
Commission; and
2. A. Approve the proposed program refinement and
– 36 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 142
notify the local jurisdiction;
B. Deny the program refinement;
C. Approve the proposed program refinement subject to one
or more conditions; or
D. Return the proposed program refinement back to the local
jurisdiction with a list of the changes to be made.
(iv) If the chair approves a proposed program refinement subject to
one or more conditions under [item (iii)3] SUBPARAGRAPH (III)2C of this paragraph, the
local jurisdiction shall notify the Commission within 60 days of its intent to adopt the
conditions.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Stylistic errors in § 8–1809(q)(4) and (r)(3)(iii) and (iv) of the Natural
Resources Article and erroneous internal reference in § 8–1809(r)(3)(iv) of the Natural
Resources Article.
Occurred: Ch. 55, Acts of 2006.
10–301.
(g) (4) Subject to paragraph (7) of this subsection, the fees for hunting and
trapping licenses are according to the following schedule:
(x) Nonresident trapping license .....................................$50.00
10–502.
(a) Any nonresident of the State who desires to trap furbearers, except otter or
beaver, first shall procure a nonresident trapper’s license in addition to any other license
required. The license shall be issued only to residents of other states which grant the same
trapping privileges to Maryland residents.
(b) The license shall be:
(1) Issued for a [$25.50] $50 fee or a fee equal to that charged by the
nonresident’s home state for a similar license, whichever is greater;
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Misnomer in § 10–502(b)(1) of the Natural Resources Article.
– 37 –

Ch. 142 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Occurred: As a result of Chs. 543 and 544, Acts of 2023, which established an
increased annual fee for the nonresident trapper’s license under § 10–301(g)(4)(x) of the
Natural Resources Article, but did not make the necessary corresponding change to the
license fee under § 10–502(b)(1) of the Natural Resources Article.
Article – Public Safety
1–307.
(c) The MARYLAND Department OF EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT shall
summarize and analyze the information provided under subsection (b)(3) of this section
and, subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, submit to the Senate [Education,
Health, and Environmental Affairs] FINANCE Committee and the House Health and
Government Operations Committee:
(1) the summary and analysis;
(2) any associated recommendations to address issues raised by the
analysis; and
(3) a description of any measures implemented by the Department to
address issues raised by the analysis.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Incorrect word usage and erroneous committee reference in § 1–307(c) of the
Public Safety Article.
Occurred: Ch. 349, Acts of 2022 and as a result of a change in jurisdiction of the
Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and the Environment (formerly the Senate
Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs Committee) and the Senate Finance
Committee in 2023, which resulted in all health matters being handled by the Senate
Finance Committee.
3–209.
(b) The certification of a police officer who fails to obtain United States citizenship
as required by subsection [(a)(4)(ii)] (A)(5)(II) of this section shall be terminated by the
Commission.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Erroneous internal reference in § 3–209(b) of the Public Safety Article.
Occurred: As a result of Ch. 59, Acts of 2021, which renumbered § 3–209(a)(4) of the
Public Safety Article to be § 3–209(a)(5).
– 38 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 142
3–313.
(b) (1) (I) The Governor may delegate the power to suspend a commission
to the Secretary.
[(i)] (II) The Secretary may suspend a commission if it appears
that the action is in the best interest of the public.
[(ii)] (III) A suspension issued by the Secretary shall be reviewed by
the Governor within 30 days to determine if the suspension should continue or if the
commission should be terminated.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Tabulation error in § 3–313(b)(1) of the Public Safety Article.
Occurred: Ch. 298, Acts of 2015.
3–507.
(b) [Every year, on] ON or before March 1, 2016, and March 1 of each subsequent
year, each local law enforcement agency shall provide the Governor’s Office of Crime
Prevention and Policy with information, for the previous calendar year, about each
officer–involved death and death in the line of duty that involved a law enforcement officer
employed by the agency, to include at a minimum:
(1) the age, gender, ethnicity, and race of a deceased individual;
(2) the age, gender, ethnicity, and race of the officer involved;
(3) a brief description of the circumstances surrounding the death;
(4) the date, time, and location of the death; and
(5) the law enforcement agency of the officer who:
(i) died, if the incident involved an officer who died in the line of
duty; or
(ii) detained, arrested, or was in the process of arresting the
deceased, if the incident involved an officer–involved death.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Extraneous language in § 3–507(b) of the Public Safety Article.
– 39 –

Ch. 142 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Occurred: Ch. 134, Acts of 2015.
4–1703.
(d) The Governor’s Office of Crime [Prevention, Youth, and Victim Services]
PREVENTION AND POLICY shall administer the Fund.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Obsolete terminology in § 4–1703(d) of the Public Safety Article.
Occurred: As a result of Executive Order 01.01.2024.05, which separated the
Governor’s Office of Crime Prevention, Youth, and Victim Services into the Governor’s
Office for Children and the Governor’s Office of Crime Prevention and Policy.
13–901.
(b) Without authority under the laws of the United States or this State, a person
may not wear a uniform or distinctive part of a uniform or an item similar to a uniform or
a distinctive part of a uniform of:
(1) the United States Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Space Force,
or Coast Guard; [or]
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Extraneous conjunction in § 13–901(b)(1) of the Public Safety Article.
Occurred: Ch. 5, § 2, Acts of 2003.
13A–1108.
This title shall be so construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make it
uniform, so far as [practical] PRACTICABLE, with the Uniform Code of Military Justice,
10 U.S.C. 47.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Incorrect word usage in § 13A–1108 of the Public Safety Article.
Occurred: Ch. 592, § 2, Acts of 2020.
14–3A–05.
(b) (3) (i) If the Secretary or other designated official determines that the
– 40 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 142
notice required in paragraph (2) of this subsection is [impractical] IMPRACTICABLE
because of the number of individuals or geographical areas affected, the Secretary or other
designated official shall ensure that the affected individuals are fully informed of the
directive using the best possible means available.
(ii) If the directive applies to a group of individuals and it is
[impractical] IMPRACTICABLE to provide individual written copies under paragraph (2) of
this subsection, the written directive may be posted in a conspicuous place in the isolation
or quarantine premises.
(c) (7) If the court determines that the delivery required by paragraph (6)(iii)
of this subsection is [impractical] IMPRACTICABLE because of the number of individuals
or geographical area affected, the court shall ensure that the affected individuals are fully
informed of the order using the best possible means available.
(f) (1) Subject to any emergency rules that the Supreme Court of Maryland
adopts under paragraph (3) of this subsection, the court may order the consolidation of
individual claims into group claims in proceedings brought under this section if:
(i) the large number of individuals involved or affected makes
individual participation [impractical] IMPRACTICABLE;
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Incorrect word usage in § 14–3A–05(b)(3)(i) and (ii), (c)(7), and (f)(1)(i) of the
Public Safety Article.
Occurred: Ch. 26, Acts of 2004.
14–1102.
(d) (1) (ii) An appointed member may not serve for more than [2] TWO
consecutive [three year] 3–YEAR terms.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Stylistic errors in § 14–1102(d)(1)(ii) of the Public Safety Article.
Occurred: Chs. 724 and 725, Acts of 2021.
Article – Public Utilities
7–310.
(c) The purpose of the Fund is to provide resources to improve the Commission’s
ability to:
– 41 –

Ch. 142 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) educate customers on:
(ii) energy choices that help meet the State’s climate commitments
under [§§ 7–211 and] § 7–319 of this subtitle and [§§ 2–1204.1 and] § 2–1204.2 of the
Environment Article;
(g) The Fund may be used only to:
(1) educate retail electric or gas customers on retail choice and energy
choices that help to meet the State’s climate commitments under [§§ 7–211 and] § 7–319
of this subtitle and [§§ 2–1204.1 and] § 2–1204.2 of the Environment Article;
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Obsolete cross–references in § 7–310(c)(1)(ii) and (g)(1) of the Public Utilities
Article.
Occurred: As a result of Ch. 539, Acts of 2024, which repealed § 7–211 of the Public
Utilities Article, and Ch. 537, Acts of 2024, which included a cross–reference to § 12–1204.1
of the Environment Article that abrogated on December 31, 2023, as a result of Ch. 11, § 6,
Acts of 2016.
7–510.3.
(j) (1) A community choice aggregator may not assess any new fee, tax, or
other charge in the aggregation charges or rates that is not related to the cost of:
(iii) providing and promoting energy efficiency programs promoted
under [paragraphs] PARAGRAPH (2) or (3) of this subsection.
(v) On or before December 31, 2023, the Commission shall adopt regulations to
implement this section, including regulations for:
(8) procedures to protect A customer’s privacy and confidential data
collected or held by a community choice aggregator;
(11) the approval of a tariff structure for community choice aggregator
interactions with electric companies, including:
(i) billing and payment collection;
(ii) dispute resolution;
(iii) financial settlement;
– 42 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 142
(iv) losses;
(v) metering services;
(vi) PJM Interconnection requirements;
(vii) scheduling; and
(viii) utility charges; AND
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Grammatical error in § 7–510.3(j)(1)(iii) of the Public Utilities Article; omitted
word in § 7–510.3(v)(8) of the Public Utilities Article; and omitted conjunction in §
7–510.3(v)(11) of the Public Utilities Article.
Occurred: Ch. 449, § 2, Acts of 2021.
7–703.
(b) Except as provided in subsections (e) and (f) of this section, the renewable
energy portfolio standard shall be as follows:
(21) in 2026:
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources; [and]
(22) in 2027:
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources; [and]
(23) in 2028:
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources; [and]
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Extraneous conjunctions in § 7–703(b)(21)(ii), (22)(ii), and (23)(ii) of the Public
Utilities Article.
Occurred: As a result of Chs. 164 and 673, Acts of 2021.
7–705.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, each electricity
supplier shall submit a report to the Commission each year in a form and by a date specified
– 43 –

Ch. 142 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
by the Commission that:
(iii) documents the amounts and types of generation associated with
renewable energy credits purchased in compliance with [§ 7–707(b)] § 7–707(C) of this
subtitle during the reporting period; and
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Erroneous cross–reference in § 7–705(a)(1)(iii) of the Public Utilities Article.
Occurred: Ch. 537, Acts of 2024.
7–707.
(d) (1) The price approved by the Commission under subsection [(b)(2)] (C)(2)
of this section shall be determined through:
(i) a proceeding held in accordance with paragraph (2) of this
subsection; or
(ii) a proceeding held in accordance with paragraph (3) of this
subsection.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Erroneous internal reference in § 7–707(d)(1) of the Public Utilities Article.
Occurred: Ch. 537, Acts of 2024.
Article – Real Property
2–121.
(a) In this section, “family child care home” means a unit:
(1) Registered under [Title 5, Subtitle 5 of the Family Law Article] TITLE
9.5, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE; and
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Obsolete cross–reference in § 2–121(a)(1) of the Real Property Article.
Occurred: As a result of Ch. 185, § 2, Acts of 2016, which transferred provisions
relating to the registration of family child care providers from the Family Law Article to
the Education Article.
– 44 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 142
8–211.
(n) (1) After rent escrow has been established, the court:
(v) May, after a hearing, if one is requested by the tenant, order, if
no repairs are made or if no good faith effort to repair is made within 6 months of the initial
decision to place money in the escrow account, that the money in the escrow account be
disbursed to the tenant that [have] HAS paid into escrow; or
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Grammatical error in § 8–211(n)(1)(v) of the Real Property Article.
Occurred: Ch. 125, Acts of 2024.
8A–801.
(b) A park owner or AN operator of a mobile home park, or [his] THE agent or
employee OF A PARK OWNER OR AN OPERATOR OF A MOBILE HOME PARK, may not
refuse, withhold from, or deny to any person any of the accommodations, advantages,
facilities, or privileges of the mobile home park or leases to the premises because of THE
race, creed, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or national origin of that person.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Omitted articles and stylistic errors in § 8A–801(b) of the Real Property
Article.
Occurred: Ch. 843, Acts of 1980.
11–103.
(d) (1) (ii) If a declaration contains a suspension provision authorized
under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the declaration shall state that a suspension of
the use of common elements may not be implemented until the council of unit owners:
1. Mails to the unit owner a demand letter specifying a time
period of at least 10 days within which the unit owner may pay the delinquent assessment
or request a hearing to contest the suspension; and
2. If a unit owner requests a hearing to contest a suspension,
provides notice and holds a hearing in accordance with [§ 11–113(b)(2) and (3)] §
11–113(B) of this [subtitle] TITLE.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
– 45 –

Ch. 142 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Error: Erroneous cross–reference and stylistic error in § 11–103(d)(1)(ii) of the Real
Property Article.
Occurred: As a result of Ch. 282, Acts of 2022 and Ch. 345, Acts of 2018.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
2–209.
(c) (2) (vi) The Governor may remove a member for neglect of duty,
[incompetence] INCOMPETENCE, or misconduct.
(f) A member of the Council:
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State [Budget] BUDGET.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Omitted comma in § 2–209(c)(2)(vi) and capitalization error in § 2–209(f)(2) of
the State Finance and Procurement Article.
Occurred: Ch. 485, Acts of 2020.
2–210.
(b) (1) In order to improve efficiency, streamline and reduce redundant
processes, reduce paperwork and administrative burdens on both granting agencies and
grant recipients, and facilitate development and implementation of a statewide centralized
grants management and accountability system, the Council shall study and make
recommendations to the Department regarding the entire grants life cycle, including:
(iii) regulations adopting each part of the [uniform guidance]
UNIFORM GUIDANCE, with appropriate modifications for its application to grant–making
entities in the State, including modifications or variances based on the scope or size of
particular grant programs, grant–making entities, or grantees;
(vi) recommended deadlines for grant–making entities to administer
State and federal grants in accordance with the provisions of parts of [uniform guidance]
UNIFORM GUIDANCE as adopted by the Department by regulation.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Capitalization error in § 2–210(b)(1)(iii) and (vi) of the State Finance and
Procurement Article.
– 46 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 142
Occurred: Chs. 484 and 485, Acts of 2020.
3–609.
(b) The Fund is a continuing, nonlapsing, revolving fund that consists of:
(1) money appropriated to the Fund:
(i) in the annual budget; or
(ii) in an annual General Construction Loan Act or in a Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan Act; [or]
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Extraneous conjunction in § 3–609(b)(1)(ii) of the State Finance and
Procurement Article.
Occurred: As a result of Ch. 463, Acts of 1995.
3.5–2A–04.
(e) (1) On or before December 31 each year, the Office shall report to the
Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the Senate
Budget and Taxation Committee, the Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental
Affairs] Committee ON EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT, the House
Appropriations Committee, the House Health and Government Operations Committee, and
the Joint Committee on Cybersecurity, Information Technology, and Biotechnology on the
activities of the Office and the state of cybersecurity preparedness in Maryland, including:
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Obsolete language in § 3.5–2A–04(e)(1) of the State Finance and Procurement
Article.
Occurred: As a result of the renaming of the Senate Education, Health, and
Environmental Affairs Committee to be the Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and
the Environment in December 2022.
3.5–303.
(a) The Secretary is responsible for carrying out the following duties:
(4) developing and maintaining a statewide information technology master
plan that will:
– 47 –

Ch. 142 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(vi) [allows] ALLOW a State agency to maintain the agency’s own
information technology unit that provides for information technology services to support
the mission of the agency;
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Grammatical error in § 3.5–303(a)(4)(vi) of the State Finance and
Procurement Article.
Occurred: Ch. 242, § 2, Acts of 2022.
3.5–309.
(i) The Fund may be used:
(3) notwithstanding [§ 3.5–301(b)(2)] § 3.5–301(E)(2) of this subtitle, for
the costs of the first 12 months of operation and maintenance of a major information
technology development project;
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Erroneous cross–reference in § 3.5–309(i)(3) of the State Finance and
Procurement Article.
Occurred: As a result of Ch. 318, Acts of 2021 and Ch. 496, Acts of 2024.
3.5–316.
(a) [(1)] In this section, [the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(2)] “Commission” means the Modernize Maryland Commission.
[(3) “Critical system” means an information technology or cybersecurity
system that is severely outdated, as determined by the Department.]
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Extraneous language in § 3.5–316(a)(3) of the State Finance and Procurement
Article.
Occurred: Ch. 243, Acts of 2022.
3.5–317.
(d) (1) Every 2 years, a contractor shall provide the results of the assessments
– 48 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 142
to:
(i) the Modernize Maryland Commission established under §
3.5–316 of this subtitle; and
(ii) in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the
Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, the Senate [Education, Health, and
Environmental Affairs] Committee ON EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE
ENVIRONMENT, and the House Health and Government Operations Committee.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Obsolete language in § 3.5–317(d)(1) of the State Finance and Procurement
Article.
Occurred: As a result of the renaming of the Senate Education, Health, and
Environmental Affairs Committee to be the Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and
the Environment in December 2022.
5–408.
(k) In accordance with the requirements of § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, the Department and the Foundation shall report on the certification program on or
before January 15 of each year to:
(3) the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee and the Senate
[Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs] Committee ON EDUCATION, ENERGY,
AND THE ENVIRONMENT; and
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Obsolete language in § 5–408(k)(3) of the State Finance and Procurement
Article.
Occurred: As a result of the renaming of the Senate Education, Health, and
Environmental Affairs Committee to be the Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and
the Environment in December 2022.
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) [1.] This [subparagraph] PARAGRAPH does not apply in fiscal
years 2024 through 2028.
[2.] (II) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and
unless inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or
with the terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated
– 49 –

Ch. 142 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
by the State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise
entitled to receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to
the General Fund of the State.
[(ii)] (III) The provisions of subparagraph [(i)] (II) of this paragraph
do not apply to the following funds:
1. Maryland Housing Loan Funds of 1976, 1978, 1979, and
1984;
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Erroneous internal reference and tabulation error in § 6–226(a)(2) of the State
Finance and Procurement Article.
Occurred: Ch. 717, Acts of 2024.
13–108.
(b) (5) If supplies or commodities procured under an emergency procurement
contract are not delivered and used within 1 month after the date the contract is awarded,
the unit shall:
(i) prepare a report describing the delivery and use status of
supplies and commodities procured under the contract at least once per month until all
supplies and commodities have been delivered and used; and
(ii) submit the reports prepared under this paragraph to the Board,
the appropriate control agency, and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, the Senate [Education, Health, and
Environmental Affairs] Committee ON EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE
ENVIRONMENT, the House Appropriations Committee, the House Health and Government
Operations Committee, and the Joint Audit and Evaluation Committee.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Obsolete language in § 13–108(b)(5) of the State Finance and Procurement
Article.
Occurred: As a result of the renaming of the Senate Education, Health, and
Environmental Affairs Committee to be the Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and
the Environment in December 2022.
13–112.1.
(e) (4) The Maryland Environmental Service shall provide copies of each
– 50 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 142
review conducted under this subsection to:
(i) each unit for which the Service reviewed and evaluated a
contract; and
(ii) in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the
Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs] Committee ON EDUCATION,
ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT, the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, the
House Environment and Transportation Committee, and the House Appropriations
Committee.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Obsolete language in § 13–112.1(e)(4) of the State Finance and Procurement
Article.
Occurred: Chs. 237 and 238, Acts of 2022, as a result of the renaming of the Senate
Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs Committee to be the Senate Committee on
Education, Energy, and the Environment in December 2022.
14–106.
(g) In addition to the duties specified under subsection (f) of this section, the
[committee] COMMITTEE shall:
(1) establish and periodically review eligibility policies or guidelines for
participating community service providers and individual with disability owned
businesses;
(2) maintain a current list of community service providers and individual
with disability owned businesses;
(3) periodically review and revise its list of community service providers
and individual with disability owned businesses; and
(4) send any revised list to the Chief Procurement Officer who shall make
the list available to each person responsible for buying supplies or services for the State or
a State aided or controlled entity.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Capitalization error in § 14–106(g) of the State Finance and Procurement
Article.
Occurred: Chs. 527 and 528, Acts of 2022.
– 51 –

Ch. 142 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
14–110.
(e) Within 60 days after receipt of all of the reports required under subsections
(c) and (d) of this section, the Department of General Services shall submit a summary of
the information to:
(1) the Board of Public Works; and
(2) in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the
Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs] Committee ON EDUCATION,
ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT, the House Health and Government Operations
Committee, and the Legislative Policy Committee.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Obsolete language in § 14–110(e)(2) of the State Finance and Procurement
Article.
Occurred: As a result of the renaming of the Senate Education, Health, and
Environmental Affairs Committee to be the Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and
the Environment in December 2022.
15–111.
(c) Within 90 days after the end of each fiscal year, the Chief Procurement Officer
shall submit to the Governor, the Legislative Policy Committee, the Senate Budget and
Taxation Committee, the Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs]
Committee ON EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT, the House
Appropriations Committee, the House Health and Government Operations Committee, and
the Joint Audit and Evaluation Committee a consolidated report that includes each report
required under subsection (a) of this section.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Obsolete language in § 15–111(c) of the State Finance and Procurement
Article.
Occurred: As a result of the renaming of the Senate Education, Health, and
Environmental Affairs Committee to be the Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and
the Environment in December 2022.
Article – State Government
20–601.
(b) (2) “Disability” includes:
– 52 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 142
(ii) [retardation] INTELLECTUAL and any other mental impairment
or deficiency that may have necessitated remedial or special education and related services.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Obsolete terminology in § 20–601(b)(2)(ii) of the State Government Article.
Occurred: Ch. 120, Acts of 2009.
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
2–203.1.
(c) (3) (i) This paragraph applies only to:
1. a unit of the University System of Maryland;
2. Morgan State University; [or] AND
3. St. Mary’s College of Maryland.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Erroneous conjunction in § 2–203.1(c)(3)(i) of the State Personnel and
Pensions Article.
Occurred: Ch. 278, Acts of 2024. Correction suggested by the Attorney General in the
Bill Review Letter for H.B. 506 (Ch. 278) of 2024 (footnote 3), dated April 22, 2024.
2–502.2.
(c) (6) The Department may structure a contract awarded under this
subsection to require the pharmacy benefits manager selected under [subsection (e) of this
section] § 2–502.1(G) OF THIS SUBTITLE to pay the cost of the technology platform and
associated professional services contracted under this subsection by assessing a
per–prescription fee paid by the pharmacy benefits manager directly to the technology
platform vendor.
(g) A pharmacy benefits manager that submits a bid under [subsection (e) of] A
REVERSE AUCTION PROCESS UNDER this section or enters into a contract with the
Department or a health plan described under subsection [(g)(1)] (F)(1) of this section shall
provide the Department and health plan access to complete pharmacy claims data
necessary for the Department and health plan to:
(1) conduct the reverse auction; and
– 53 –

Ch. 142 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) carry out administrative and management duties.
(h) (2) If the [prescription] PHARMACY benefits manager selected under
[subsection (e) of this section] § 2–502.1(G) OF THIS SUBTITLE asserts that the
Department has underpaid on a claim, the [prescription] PHARMACY benefits manager
may submit a contract claim as provided under Title 15, Subtitle 2 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Erroneous internal references in § 2–502.2(c)(6), (g), and (h)(2) of the State
Personnel and Pensions Article; and incorrect terminology in § 2–502.2(h)(2) of the State
Personnel and Pensions Article.
Occurred: Ch. 434, Acts of 2020.
2–516.
(b) (3) The STATE Treasurer shall separately hold and the Comptroller shall
account for the Fund.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Stylistic error in § 2–516(b)(3) of the State Personnel and Pensions Article.
Occurred: Ch. 444, Acts of 2005.
6–302.
(a) Except as provided in this [subsection] SECTION or otherwise by law, all
positions in the Executive Branch of State government are in the State Personnel
Management System.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Stylistic error in § 6–302(a) of the State Personnel and Pensions Article.
Occurred: Ch. 347, Acts of 1996.
7–207.
(e) (2) In the selection process for an initial appointment to any position at the
Baltimore CITY Juvenile Justice Center, an appointing authority shall allow five points to
each resident of the host district or an adjacent district if, in the most recent 12–month
period for which data is available as reported by the Maryland Department of Labor,
– 54 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 142
Baltimore City had an average unemployment rate that is more than 1.5 times the State
unemployment rate as a whole.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Misnomer in § 7–207(e)(2) of the State Personnel and Pensions Article.
Occurred: Ch. 347, Acts of 1996.
22–406.
(m) On or before October 1 of each year, the State Superintendent of Schools shall
submit a report for the previous school year, to the Joint Committee on Pensions, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, that provides:
(1) (ii) 1. the school and school system where each retiree was
rehired; and
2. whether the school:
A. was not making adequate yearly progress or was a school
in need of improvement as defined under the federal [No Child Left Behind Act of 2001]
ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY EDUCATION ACT and as implemented by the State
Department of Education;
B. was receiving funds under Title 1 of the federal [No Child
Left Behind Act of 2001] ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY EDUCATION ACT;
C. has more than 50% of the students attending that school
who are eligible for free and reduced–price meals established by the United States
Department of Agriculture; or
D. provided an alternative education program for adjudicated
youths or students who have been expelled, suspended, or identified for suspension or
expulsion from a public school;
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Obsolete references in § 22–406(m)(1)(ii) of the State Personnel and Pensions
Article.
Occurred: As a result of the federal Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015, which
superseded the No Child Left Behind Act and Elementary and Secondary Education Act.
26–211.
– 55 –

Ch. 142 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) On or before December 31, 2000, a member may elect to participate in the Law
Enforcement Officers’ Modified Pension Benefit under [Part II of this subtitle] THIS PART
by submitting an election on a form provided by the State Retirement Agency.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Stylistic error in § 26–211(b) of the State Personnel and Pensions Article.
Occurred: Ch. 395, § 2, Acts of 2000.
27–101.
[(a)] In this [subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Termination of service”] TITLE, “TERMINATION OF SERVICE” includes:
(1) retirement at the age required by Article IV, § 3 of the Maryland
Constitution;
(2) voluntary retirement;
(3) resignation because of disability;
(4) retirement by order of the Supreme Court of Maryland;
(5) resignation;
(6) nonelection or nonconfirmation when election or confirmation is
required;
(7) expiration of term without reappointment; or
(8) abolition of the member’s office.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Erroneous reference and stylistic error in § 27–101 of the State Personnel and
Pensions Article.
Occurred: Ch. 6, § 2, Acts of 1994.
27–404.
Except for a retiree who elects an optional form of an allowance under §§ 21–401 and
21–402 of this article, payment of an allowance ends and further rights may not arise from
service as a member if:
– 56 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 142
(2) (i) the member, former member, or retiree leaves no surviving
spouse or children who are under the age of 26 years or are disabled;
(ii) the surviving spouse dies and there are no children of the
member, former member, or retiree, who are under the age of 26 years or are disabled; or
(iii) the last of any children WHO ARE under the age of 26 years and
are not disabled becomes 26 years old or dies before becoming 26 years old.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Grammatical error in § 27–404(2) of the State Personnel and Pensions Article.
Occurred: Ch. 556, Acts of 2020.
31–305.
(a) As of the effective date of withdrawal of a participating governmental unit,
the Board of Trustees shall transfer to the administrative board of the local pension system
or new State system the portion of the assets that are allocable to the withdrawn employees
as determined under § 21–305.5, § 21–305.6, § 21–306, § 21–306.1, or [§ 26–306.2] §
21–306.2 of this article.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Erroneous cross–reference in § 31–305(a) of the State Personnel and Pensions
Article.
Occurred: Ch. 258, Acts of 2006.
Article – Tax – General
9–305.
(b) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “CONSUMER PRICE INDEX FOR ALL URBAN
CONSUMERS” MEANS THE INDEX PUBLISHED MONTHLY BY THE BUREAU OF LABOR
STATISTICS OF THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR THAT IS THE U.S. CITY AVERAGE
OF ALL ITEMS IN A BASKET OF CONSUMER GOODS AND SERVICES.
(2) The motor fuel tax rates specified in subsection (a)(2), (3), and (5) of this
section shall be increased on July 1, 2013, and July 1 of each subsequent year in accordance
with this subsection.
[(2)] (3) On or before June 1 of each year, the Comptroller shall determine
and announce:
– 57 –

Ch. 142 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) the growth in the Consumer Price Index for [all urban
consumers] ALL URBAN CONSUMERS as determined by the Comptroller under paragraph
[(3)] (4) of this subsection; and
(ii) the motor fuel tax rates effective for the fiscal year beginning on
the following July 1 as determined by the Comptroller under paragraph [(4)] (5) of this
subsection.
[(3)] (4) [(i) In this paragraph, “Consumer Price Index for all urban
consumers” means the index published monthly by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the
U.S. Department of Labor that is the U.S. city average of all items in a basket of consumer
goods and services.
(ii)] The percentage growth in the Consumer Price Index for [all
urban consumers] ALL URBAN CONSUMERS shall be determined by comparing the
average of the index for the 12 months ending on the preceding April 30 to the average of
the index for the prior 12 months.
[(4)] (5) Subject to paragraph [(5)] (6) of this subsection, on July 1 of each
year, each motor fuel tax rate specified in subsection (a)(2), (3), and (5) of this section shall
be increased by the amount, rounded to the nearest one–tenth of a cent, that equals the
product of multiplying:
(i) the motor fuel tax rate in effect on the date of the Comptroller’s
announcement under paragraph [(2)] (3) of this subsection; and
(ii) the percentage growth in the Consumer Price Index for [all
urban consumers] ALL URBAN CONSUMERS.
[(5)] (6) (i) If there is a decline or no growth in the Consumer Price
Index for [all urban consumers] ALL URBAN CONSUMERS, the motor fuel tax rates shall
remain unchanged.
(ii) Any increase in the motor fuel tax rates under paragraph [(4)]
(5) of this subsection may not be greater than 8% of the motor fuel tax rate effective in the
previous year.
[(6)] (7) The Comptroller shall require any person possessing tax–paid
motor fuel for sale at the start of business on the date of an increase in the motor fuel tax
under this subsection to compile and file an inventory of the motor fuel held at the close of
business on the immediately preceding date and remit within 30 days any additional motor
fuel tax that is due on the motor fuel.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
– 58 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 142
Error: Stylistic error and capitalization error in § 9–305(b) of the Tax – General
Article.
Occurred: Ch. 429, Acts of 2013.
10–709.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, the credit allowed against
the county income tax under subsection (b)(2) of this section equals the lesser of:
(1) the county income tax determined after subtracting the credit allowed
under [§ 10–704(c)] § 10–704(D) of this subtitle; or
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Erroneous cross–reference in § 10–709(d)(1) of the Tax – General Article.
Occurred: As a result of Ch. 40, Acts of 2021, which added a new subsection (a) to §
10–704 of the Tax – General Article and redesignated the following subsections.
Article – Transportation
21–104.3.
(f) (2) The Administrator, after consultation with industry stakeholders, may
adopt [polices] POLICIES outlining what must be included in an emergency response plan.
DRAFTER’S NOTE:
Error: Misnomer in § 21–104.3(f)(2) of the Transportation Article.
Occurred: Ch. 351, Acts of 2021.
Chapter 761 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2024. Section 2 of this Act shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and 7
months and, at the end of April 30, [2029] 2030, Section 2 of this Act, with no further action
required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Error: Incorrect calculation of year in Section 3 of Ch. 761, Acts of 2024.
Occurred: Ch. 761, Acts of 2024.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Drafter’s Notes contained
– 59 –

Ch. 142 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
in this Act are not law and may not be considered to have been enacted as part of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the provisions of this Act are
intended solely to correct technical errors in the law and there is no intent to revive or
otherwise affect law that is the subject of other acts, whether those acts were signed by the
Governor prior to or after the signing of this Act.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the publishers of the
Annotated Code of Maryland, subject to the approval of the Department of Legislative
Services, shall make any changes in the text of the Annotated Code necessary to effectuate
any termination provision that was enacted by the General Assembly and has taken effect
or will take effect prior to October 1, 2025. Any enactment of the 2025 Session of the General
Assembly that negates or extends the effect of a previously enacted termination provision
shall prevail over the provisions of this section.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the publishers of the
Annotated Code of Maryland, in consultation with and subject to the approval of the
Department of Legislative Services, shall make nonsubstantive corrections to codification,
style, capitalization, punctuation, grammar, spelling, and any reference rendered incorrect
or obsolete by an Act of the General Assembly, with no further action required by the
General Assembly. The publishers shall adequately describe any such correction in an
editor’s note following the section affected.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 60 –